Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-339
Bonds; sale; from what funds payable.

The bonds shall not be sold for less than par with accrued interest, shall show on their face the purpose for which they are issued, and shall be payable out of money derived from the drainage assessments or taxes.

Laws 1907, c. 152, § 4, p. 471;

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 10, p. 522;

R.S.1913, § 1834;

C.S.1922, § 1781;

C.S.1929, § 31-438;

R.S.1943, § 31-339.